Florida, session 2026, SB470.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (67) of section 320.08058, Florida 13 Statutes, is amended to read: 14 320.08058âSpecialty license plates.â 15 (67)âFRATERNAL ORDER OF POLICE LICENSE PLATES.â 16 (a)1.âThe department shall develop a Fraternal Order of 17 Police license plate as provided in this section. The plate must 18 bear the colors and design approved by the department. The word 19 âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the plate, and the words 20 âFraternal Order of Policeâ must appear at the bottom of the 21 plate. 22 2.âThe department may issue the plate only to an applicant 23 who submits a notarized letter from the Florida State Lodge of 24 the Fraternal Order of Police stating that the applicant is a 25 member of the lodge in good standing or a member of a lodge 26 memberâs family, together with other fees and documents required 27 for a specialty plate. 28 (b)âThe annual use fees shall be distributed to the Florida 29 State Lodge of the Fraternal Order of Police Memorial 30 Foundation, Inc., a nonprofit corporation under s. 501(c)(3) of 31 the Internal Revenue Code. The which shall retain all proceeds 32 until the startup costs to develop and establish the plate have 33 been recovered. Thereafter, the proceeds shall be distributed to 34 the Florida State Lodge Memorial foundation shall distribute the 35 proceeds for use according to the foundationâs articles of 36 incorporation of the Fraternal Order of Police and used as 37 follows: 38 1.âA maximum of 10 percent of the proceeds may be used to 39 promote and market the plate, to administer the license plate 40 program, and to pay administrative costs directly associated 41 with the state Fraternal Order of Police Law Enforcement 42 Memorial. 43 2.âThe remaining proceeds shall be used by the foundation 44 to fund projects, programs, or events related to the memorial or 45 to fund improvements, maintenance, or other support for the 46 memorial. 47 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.